California statutes. Civil Code
(e) “Borrower’s life expectancy” means the actual life expectancy of the borrower plus no more than five years. In the case of a loan executed by two borrowers, the actual life expectancy shall be based upon the youngest of the two.

(f) “Cessation of occupancy” means the rental to a third party of the right of exclusive occupancy of the subject property, or the abandonment by all coborrowers of the property as his or her residence.

(g) “Lender” means any corporation organized as a public benefit corporation pursuant to the Nonprofit Corporation Law (Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110), Div. 2, Title 1, Corp. C.).

(h) “Lender’s appreciation share” means a proportion not to exceed 25 percent of the appreciation of the property securing the loan calculated in accordance with this chapter.

(i) “Shared appreciation loan for seniors” means any loan made pursuant to this chapter upon the security of owner-occupied real property of a type specified in Section 1917.330, and in connection with which the lender has a right to receive a share
 of the appreciation in the value of the security property. “Shared appreciation loan” includes a deed of trust and any evidence of debt issued in connection with the loan.

(j) “Maturity event” means the earliest of any of the following:

(1) The death of the borrower. In the case of a married couple who are coborrowers, the death of the surviving spouse.

(2) The date of sale.

(3) The date a loan made pursuant to this chapter is refinanced or repaid in full.

(4) Cessation of occupancy.

(k) “Monthly annuity” means an amount paid in equal monthly installments to the borrower which, together with interest calculated at the stated
 rate, shall exhaust the annuity base amount during the borrower’s life expectancy.

In the event that the calculated monthly annuity exceeds the cap or ceiling determined in accordance with this subdivision, the lender may limit the actual monthly annuity payment to an amount not lower than the cap. If the cap is imposed, the lender’s appreciation share shall be limited to 25 percent times the ratio between the actual capped monthly payment and the monthly payment calculated in accordance with the first sentence of this subdivision. For example, if the monthly payment calculated in the first sentence is five thousand dollars ($5,000), but the lender applies a two thousand five hundred dollar ($2,500) ceiling, the lender’s share of the home’s appreciation shall be likewise reduced by 50 percent.

The minimum cap shall be two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for loans made during the calendar year 1989. In subsequent
 calendar years, the minimum cap shall be two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) increased to reflect the proportional increase in the Consumer Price Index for the State of California, as determined by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics, for the period from January 1, 1989, until the November monthly index figure for the year prior to the year in which the loan agreement is entered into.

(l) “Net advance” means any lump-sum advance of funds by the lender to the borrower made at the time of the loan closing. Net advance shall not exceed 15 percent of the projected loan amount.

(m) “Net appreciated value” means the difference between the fair market value of the property securing the loan at the time the loan is made and the fair market value of the property securing the loan at the time of the maturity event, less any credit for approved improvements made during
 the term of the loan.

(n) “Prevailing rate” means the yield of a 30-year mortgage commitment for delivery within 30 days for a standard conventional fixed rate mortgage of the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation.

(o) “Projected contingent interest” means the lender’s appreciation share of the projected appreciation of the property securing the loan from the date of the loan until the end of the borrower’s life expectancy, using the same reasonable projection of annual appreciation used in determining the projected loan amount.

(p) “Projected loan amount” means not less than 75 percent of the estimated fair market value of the borrower’s home at the end of the borrower’s life expectancy, calculated by applying to the fair market value a reasonable projection of appreciation over the borrower’s life expectancy based
 on a reasonable projected annual appreciation rate of the fair market value of the home.

(q) “Sale” means any transfer of title to the property and includes the execution of an installment sale contract giving the purchaser a right to possess the property before transfer of title, refinancing, judicial sale on execution, or other legal process of foreclosure or trustee’s sale, but “sale” does not include a transfer specified in Section 2924.6 if any spouse to whom the property is transferred is also a coborrower.

(r) “Stated interest rate” means a total interest rate of not more than four-fifths of the prevailing rate.

(s) “Total loan obligation” means the net original loan and the sum total of all monthly annuity payments received by the borrower, with interest on all outstanding amounts calculated no more often
 than monthly at the stated interest rate, and actual contingent interest plus interest at the prevailing rate as disclosed to the borrower at the time the loan was entered into on all of the above amounts from the date of any maturity event until the outstanding loan obligation is repaid in full. In no event shall the total loan obligation exceed the actual fair market value of the home on the date of the maturity event.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1406, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Terms and Conditions [1917.330. - 1917.334.]

1917.330.

Lenders may make shared appreciation loans for seniors pursuant to this chapter for the refinancing of real property improved with one- to four-dwelling units, including structures ancillary to such dwelling units and including attached single-family dwelling units, single-family mobilehome units, residential condominium units, and dwelling units within a planned unit development. Shared appreciation loans shall be made to refinance only owner-occupied dwelling units, but in the case of two- to four-unit dwellings financed under this chapter, only one of the units need be owner-occupied. A dwelling unit shall be conclusively deemed to be
 owner-occupied for purposes of this chapter with respect to initial qualification for participation in the loan program if a borrower certifies in writing to the lender at the time the loan is made that he or she will occupy the property.

Nothing contained herein shall be deemed or interpreted to restrict a lender from providing a shared appreciation loan based solely upon the value of the real property upon which the borrower’s dwelling is situated, secured only by that real property and not by the improvements thereon. In that case, the lender’s actual contingent interest, and any other necessary calculations, shall be based upon the land value alone, not taking into account any improvements thereon. This paragraph is declaratory of existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1406, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.331.

(a) A shared appreciation loan for seniors shall include all of the following:

(1) The term of the loan shall be for an open-ended term, terminating upon the occurrence of a maturity event, or the failure of the borrower to meet the terms of a deed of trust granted by the borrower to the lender which are normally and customarily used by mortgage lenders in this state for loans secured by residential real property. However, if the maturity event is either cessation of occupancy of the property by the borrower or death of the borrower, the term shall be extended
 until the earlier of the sale or refinancing of the property or 12 months after the occurrence of the maturity event.

(2) An initial advance, if desired by the borrower.

(3) Monthly annuity payments which shall continue until the occurrence of a maturity event, or earlier termination in accordance with paragraph (1).

(4) Interest on (2) and (3), calculated no more often than monthly at the stated interest rate.

(5) Actual contingent interest.

(6) Interest on paragraphs (2) to (5), inclusive, compounded no more often than monthly, from the date of a maturity event until the loan is repaid in full. 

(b) The loan shall be
 secured by a deed of trust on the real property financed.

(c) The aggregate amount of any fee charged to the borrower by the lender for processing an application, preparing any necessary documents, obtaining a credit report, or any other costs incurred by the lender in connection with originating a shared appreciation loan for seniors shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500). No prepaid interest shall be charged to the borrower.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1406, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.332.

Any provision in any loan made pursuant to this chapter for the discontinuation or termination of a monthly annuity other than upon the occurrence of a maturity event is void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1701, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.333.

(a) The borrower shall have the right to prepay, at any time, in full or in part, the total loan obligation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1701, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.334.

Except as provided in this article, the terms and conditions of the shared appreciation loan for seniors shall be subject to all laws applicable to loans in effect on the date the loan is made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1701, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Determination of Fair Market Value [1917.410. - 1917.412.]

1917.410.

The borrower, at any time for the purpose of facilitating a sale of the property or prepaying or refinancing the loan, may request the lender to stipulate the minimum amount which the lender considers to be the fair market value of the property for the purposes of this chapter. The lender shall advise the borrower within 10 working days of the receipt of such request of the lender’s estimate of the minimum fair market value. The estimate shall remain effective for purposes of this section for 90 days. For the purposes of this section and Section 1917.411, a sale of the property shall be deemed to have occurred within the 90-day period if there is a
 valid contract entered by an offer and acceptance within the 90-day period for the sale of the property. The lender’s stipulation shall remain effective for an additional 60 days following execution of the sale contract to permit completion of the sale and close of escrow.

The lender shall not be liable to the borrower or any other party on account of damages alleged as a result of providing the stipulation or estimate required by this section if such stipulation or estimate is made in good faith. Evidence of lack of good faith shall include, but not be limited to, a showing that the lender has willfully or repeatedly overrepresented the fair market value of other properties in similar situations, applying equitable principles to those determinations. The lender shall be conclusively presumed to have acted in good faith and no action may be brought or maintained against a lender which arises out of the provision by the lender of such stipulation or estimate, if the
 lender relied upon an appraisal of an independent appraiser approved by the Federal National Mortgage Association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1701, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.411.

(a) In the case of a sale for cash within 90 days after the lender stipulates, under the provisions of Section 1917.410, a minimum amount which the lender considers to be the fair market value of the property, the fair market value shall be the gross sale price, unless the gross sale price is below the minimum amount stipulated by the lender and the lender contests in writing the reasonableness of the gross sale price in relation to the fair market value within 10 working days of the lender’s receipt of notice of the gross sale price from the borrower, in which case fair market value shall be the greater of gross sale price or
 the amount determined under Section 1917.412.

(b) In the case of a sale for cash where the borrower has not requested the lender under the provisions of Section 1917.410 to stipulate to the minimum amount which the lender considers to be the fair market value of the property or where the stipulated minimum amount was provided by the lender more than 90 days prior to the date of sale, fair market value shall be the gross sale price, unless the lender contests in writing the reasonableness of the gross sale price in relation to the fair market value within 10 working days of the lender’s receipt of notice of the gross sale price from borrower, in which case fair market value shall be the greater of the gross sale price or the amount determined under Section 1917.412.

(c) In the case of a sale which includes consideration to the seller other than cash, fair market value shall be as
 determined under Section 1917.412.

(d) If the shared appreciation loan is prepaid in full, or upon the occurrence of a maturity event, fair market value shall be as determined under Section 1917.412.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1701, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.412.

When Section 1917.411 requires the application of this section, the fair market value shall be determined by averaging two appraisals of the property performed as described in this section. If possible, the appraisals shall be based on the sale prices of comparable properties in the market area sold within the preceding three-month period. The appraisals shall be made upon request of the lender by two independent residential appraisers, one to be selected by the lender and one by the borrower. Each appraiser shall be approved by the Federal National Mortgage Association. The cost of the appraiser selected by the lender shall be borne by the lender,
 and the cost of the appraiser selected by the borrower shall be borne by the borrower, unless the average of the two appraisals equals or is less than the gross sale price of the property, in which case the lender shall also pay the fee of the borrower’s appraiser up to two hundred dollars ($200). If either of the appraisers determines that the gross sale price does not reasonably reflect the fair market value of the property, or, in the case of a sale for which appraisal is required by this section, then the fair market value of the property shall be determined as the average of the two appraisals. If the borrower fails to select a qualified appraiser within 15 days after the lender has notified the borrower in writing of the lender’s request for an appraisal of the property, the reasons therefor, and the borrower’s option to select an independent appraiser within 15 days after the lender’s request is submitted to the borrower, the lender may designate the second appraiser, provided the lender’s request
 informs the borrower of this time limitation, and that the lender will select an appraiser on behalf of the borrower in the event the borrower fails to designate an appraiser, with consequent cost to the borrower. If pursuant to this section the lender designates the second appraiser, the cost of both appraisals shall be borne equally by the borrower and lender. If in any case the property has been damaged (other than normal wear and tear) and the damage has not been fully repaired, the determination of fair market value shall be based on the condition of the property not including the damage.

Nothing in this section shall preclude the borrower and lender from establishing the fair market value of the property by mutual agreement in lieu of appraisals pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1701, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Improvements [1917.510. - 1917.511.]

1917.510.

The borrower may have the value of capital improvements added to the fair market value of the borrower’s property, for purposes of determining the total loan obligation, but only if the procedures set forth in this article are followed.

(a) Within 60 days following the completion of capital improvements during any 12-month period with a cost in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000), the borrower shall send by first-class mail a notice of the completion of the improvements to the lender and shall submit proof of cost and an estimate of the increase in value of the property by reason
 of the improvements.

(b) If, within 30 days of receipt of the notice, the lender questions the claimed increase in value of the property by reason of the improvements, the lender and the borrower may, by mutual agreement, establish the value of the capital improvements or the lender may require appraisal of the property. An appraisal shall be made to determine the increase in value of the property, if any, by reason of the improvements, by two appraisers selected in the same manner specified in Section 1917.412. If appraisals are performed, the increase in value resulting from the improvements for the purposes of this section, shall be one-half of the sum of the two appraisals. The cost of the appraiser selected by the borrower shall be borne by the borrower, and the cost of the appraiser selected by the lender shall be borne by the lender.

(c) A credit for the value of capital
 improvements shall be provided if the increase in value of the property resulting therefrom is determined pursuant to subdivision (b) to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(d) If 50 percent or more of the value of the labor or other work on the improvements was performed by the borrower, then the actual cost of the improvements need not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for purposes of making application under subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1701, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.511.

Nothing in this article shall preclude a shared appreciation loan for seniors from providing the borrower with a greater credit for improvements than specified in this article, provided the relevant disclosures required by Article 7 (commencing with Section 1917.710) are appropriately modified to accurately disclose the terms of the credit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1701, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. General Provisions [1917.610. - 1917.619.]

1917.610.

The relationship of the borrower and the lender of a shared appreciation loan for seniors is that of debtor and creditor and shall not be, or be construed to be, a joint venture, an equity venture, a partnership, or other relationship.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1701, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.611.

Any waiver of any right of a borrower under the provisions of this chapter shall be void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1701, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.612.

This chapter facilitates one method of making shared appreciation loans to senior citizens in this state. The terms and conditions of any shared appreciation loan for seniors made pursuant to this chapter shall be consistent with this chapter. This chapter does not, however, apply to or limit shared appreciation financing of real property of a type made pursuant to other provisions of law, or which is not otherwise unlawful. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed in any way to affect shared appreciation financing of residential property of senior citizens not meeting the criteria specified in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1701, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.613.

A shared appreciation loan for seniors shall not be subject to any provision of this code or the Financial Code which limits the interest rate or change of interest rate of variable interest rate or renegotiable interest instruments, or which requires particular language or provisions in security instruments securing variable or renegotiable rate obligations or in evidences of those debts.

This section is declaratory of existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1701, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.614.

The lien of a deed of trust securing a shared appreciation loan for seniors shall include and secure the total loan obligation of the shared appreciation loan for seniors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1701, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.615.

The lien of a shared appreciation loan for seniors, including the total loan obligation, shall attach from the time of the recordation of the deed of trust securing the loan, and the lien, including the lien of the total loan obligation accrued or to be accrued, shall have priority over any other lien or encumbrance affecting the property secured by the shared appreciation instrument and
 recorded after the time of recordation of the shared appreciation instrument. However, nothing in this section or Section 1917.614 shall preclude a junior lien or encumbrance subordinate to the total loan obligation of the shared appreciation loan for seniors. In no case may a junior lien achieve priority over the lien securing the total loan obligation of the shared appreciation loan, provided that nothing in this section shall be construed to supersede Section 8450.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 12.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.616.

A shared appreciation loan for seniors which bears a fixed interest rate complying with the usury provisions of Article XV of the California Constitution shall not be deemed to become usurious by reason of the payment of actual contingent interest pursuant to this chapter; provided, however, that in no event may the amount of actual contingent interest received by the lender, plus the stated interest received by the lender, result in an annual percentage rate in excess of 1.5 times the applicable usury rate calculated pursuant to Article XV of the California Constitution, when all of such interest is applied over the actual term of the
 loan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1701, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.617.

The qualification requirements of Sections 25110, 25120, and 25130 of the Corporations Code do not apply to a shared appreciation loan for seniors to the extent the exemption afforded by subdivision (p) of Section 25100 of that code is applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1701, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.618.

Any loan made pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to Section 580b of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1701, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.619.

Pursuant to the authority contained in Section 1 of Article XV of the California Constitution, the restrictions upon rates of interest contained in Section 1 of Article XV of the California Constitution shall not apply to any obligation of any loan made by any lender pursuant to this chapter.

This section creates and authorizes lenders under this chapter as an exempt class of persons pursuant to Section 1 of Article XV of the Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1701, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Notices and Disclosures [1917.710. - 1917.714.]

1917.710.

(a) The disclosures made pursuant to this chapter, as required, shall be the only disclosures required to be made pursuant to state law for shared appreciation loans for seniors, notwithstanding any contrary provision applicable to loans not made under this chapter, except those, if any, that may be required by reason of the application of Division 1 (commencing with Section 25000) of the Corporations Code, or Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 11000) of Part 2 of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code. However, a lender shall not be precluded from supplementing the disclosures required by this chapter with additional
 disclosures that are not inconsistent with the disclosures required by this chapter.

(b) Whenever specific language is prescribed by this chapter, substantially the same language shall be utilized if possible, but reasonably equivalent language may be used to the extent necessary or appropriate to achieve a clearer or more accurate disclosure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1701, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.711.

(a) Each lender offering shared appreciation loans for seniors shall furnish to a prospective borrower, on the earlier of the dates on which the lender first provides written information concerning shared appreciation loans for seniors by the lender or provides a loan application form to the prospective borrower, a written disclosure as provided in this section, in type of not less than 10 point.

(b) The disclosure shall be entitled “INFORMATION ABOUT THE (Name of Lender) SHARED APPRECIATION LOAN FOR SENIORS,” and shall describe the operation and effect of the
 shared appreciation loan for seniors, including a brief summary of its terms and conditions, together with a statement consisting of substantially the following language, to the extent applicable to such loan: 
INFORMATION ABOUT THE SHARED APPRECIATION LOANS FOR SENIORS
Your lender is pleased to offer you the opportunity to borrow against the equity in your home through a Shared Appreciation Loan for Seniors.

Because the Shared Appreciation Loan for Seniors differs from the usual mortgage loan, the law requires that you have a detailed explanation of the special features of the loan before you apply. Before you sign your particular Shared Appreciation Loan for Seniors documents, you will receive more information about your particular Shared Appreciation Loan for Seniors, which you should read
 and understand before you sign the loan documents.

Receipt of shared appreciation loan proceeds could be considered income, thereby reducing payments received under government benefit programs, such as Supplemental Security Income (SSI). If this income is accumulated, the payments will be considered a resource, and could terminate your eligibility for SSI or Medi-Cal. See your legal adviser for more information. 
I
GENERAL TERMS
A Shared Appreciation Loan for Seniors will provide you with funds to pay off any existing indebtedness on your home and to pay the closing costs for the loan, and will then advance funds to you each month (monthly annuity) (1) for so long as you or your spouse who is a coborrower live; or (2) until you sell the house; or (3) until you decide to refinance the property and pay off your
 Shared Appreciation Loan for Seniors; or (4) until you cease to occupy the property as your residence, meaning either that the property has been rented out for exclusive use by a nonborrower, or the abandonment by all coborrowers of the property as their residence. Any of these four events are considered “maturity events,” and will constitute the end of the obligation to advance funds to you. The maturity events are described more fully in the promissory note. Your monthly annuity is calculated according to the method described in Section II, below. You will also be required to fulfill any customary terms or conditions included in the deed of trust encumbering your property.

Each advance of funds you receive, including both initial advances (net original loan) and each monthly annuity, will be considered outstanding principal on your loan and will bear a stated interest rate which will be not more than 80 percent of the prevailing rate of interest in the locality in
 which you live. No payments on your total loan obligation need be made by you until the occurrence of one of the four maturity events described above.

In exchange for a stated interest rate which is below the prevailing rate, you will be obligated to pay us additional interest later, in the form of a share of the appreciation of your home between the time you execute the promissory note and the occurrence of a maturity event. This additional interest is called “actual contingent interest” and is described more fully below at Section III. Once a maturity event has occurred, interest at the prevailing rate compounded not more often than monthly shall accrue on the entire outstanding loan balance, including the actual contingent interest, until repayment in full of the loan.

Balloon Payment of Principal. If you do not sell the property before the occurrence of a maturity event, you or your successors will need to refinance or
 pay this loan at that time. The term of this loan is until occurrence of a maturity event. However, if the maturity event is cessation of occupancy or death of the borrowers, the term shall be extended until the earlier of the sale or refinancing of the property, or 12 months after occurrence of the maturity event. We will not refinance either the unpaid balance of the loan or the contingent interest at that time; you or your successors alone will be responsible for obtaining refinancing. If you refinance this loan, your monthly payments may increase substantially if the property has appreciated significantly or if the interest rate on the refinancing loan is much higher than today’s prevailing rates. In general, the more your property appreciates, the larger will be the amount of the actual contingent interest that you will have an obligation to pay or refinance.

Tax and Estate Consequences. USE OF THE SHARED APPRECIATION LOAN FOR SENIORS WILL HAVE INCOME TAX OR
 ESTATE PLANNING CONSEQUENCES WHICH WILL DEPEND UPON YOUR OWN FINANCIAL AND TAX SITUATION. FOR FURTHER INFORMATION, YOU ARE URGED TO CONSULT YOUR OWN ACCOUNTANT, ATTORNEY, OR OTHER FINANCIAL ADVISER.

THE QUESTIONS YOU SHOULD DISCUSS INCLUDE THE TAX DEDUCTIBILITY OF THE CONTINGENT INTEREST PAYMENT, YOUR RIGHT TO UTILIZE THAT DEDUCTION IN YEARS OTHER THAN THE YEAR IT IS PAID, AND THE EFFECT OF THE LOSS OF TAX BENEFITS BEFORE THAT TIME. BECAUSE YOU WILL BE BORROWING A SIGNIFICANT AMOUNT OF THE EQUITY IN YOUR HOME, WHEN A MATURITY EVENT OCCURS AND YOUR LOAN IS REPAID, LITTLE OR NO EQUITY MAY REMAIN FOR YOU OR YOUR HEIRS.

Determining Fair Market Value. If you sell your property, the gross sale price will be the fair market value of the property, unless appraisals are requested by us and the appraisals average more than the gross sale price. However, at your request, we also will tell you what we consider to be the fair market
 value of the property. If you sell for cash for a gross sale price that equals or exceeds that amount, the gross sale price will control and appraisals will not be needed.

Fair market value is determined by appraisals in the event of sales involving a consideration other than cash, prepayment of the loan in full, or any other maturity event.

When appraisals are required, fair market value is determined by averaging two independent appraisals of the property. You may select one of the two appraisers from a list approved by the Federal National Mortgage Association. If appraisals are requested by us, we will provide you with full information on how to select an appraiser.

In lieu of appraisals, we may establish fair market value at an agreed amount if an agreement can be reached between you and us.

Determining Value of Capital Improvements.
 Capital improvements with a value exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) (but no maintenance or repair costs) may be added to the value of the property for the purpose of determining the net appreciated value, but only if the procedures set forth in the shared appreciation loan documents are followed. It is important to note that capital improvements completed and claimed in any 12-month period must add more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) in value to the property and must generally also cost more than one thousand dollars ($1,000). However, if you have performed at least one-half the value of the labor or other work involved, then the cost of the improvements will not be considered. The appraised value of the improvements will be the increase in the value of the property resulting from the improvements. You will receive no credit for minor or major repairs or for improvements that are not appraised at more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), but the lender will acquire a share of any resulting
 appreciation in the value of the property. 
II
CALCULATION OF MONTHLY ANNUITY
Your Shared Appreciation Loan for Seniors consists of two components: first, an initial advance to cover the cost of paying off any existing liens which you wish to pay off, and to cover closing costs; and second, a monthly annuity.

Your Shared Appreciation Loan for Seniors is designed to provide a monthly stream of funds for the remainder of the lives of the borrowers, with no payments on the loan due at any time during the lives of the borrowers unless the property is sold or the loan is refinanced or repaid in full or until you cease to occupy the property. In determining the amount that it is able to lend, the lender estimates what at least 75 percent of the value of the borrower’s home is likely to be at the end of the borrower’s
 life expectancy, based on a reasonable projected appreciation rate per year. Borrowers’ estimated life spans are predicted on the basis of “actuarial tables” prepared by the government and the insurance industry; and are based only upon estimated female life span, plus up to five years, to avoid any discriminatory effect between the sexes in determining loan amounts and for conservative lending practices. Once the maximum amount which may be loaned has been determined, the amount necessary to pay off existing liens and for closing costs, plus interest at the stated interest rate on that amount for the borrower’s life expectancy, is subtracted. The “projected contingent interest” that is predicted to have been earned at the end of the estimated life span is also subtracted. A monthly annuity is then calculated on the remaining amount, based on the stated interest and the borrower’s life expectancy.

This complex calculation is illustrated by the following example:

Mr. and Mrs. Smith, who are 73 and 71 years of age, respectively, live in a home with a current value of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000), and apply for a Shared Appreciation Loan for Seniors. According to acceptable actuarial tables, Mrs. Smith, the younger of the two, has a remaining actuarial life span of 18 years. At the end of the 18 years, at a 4 percent per year projected appreciation rate, the house would be worth three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000), 80 percent of which equals two hundred forty thousand dollars ($240,000) (the lender could have based the calculation on as little as 75 percent of the three hundred thousand dollar ($300,000) projected value). The house currently has a fifteen thousand dollar ($15,000) first mortgage, and closing costs will be approximately two thousand dollars ($2,000), and the Smiths’ wish to receive an initial advance to pay off the mortgage and to cover closing costs.

At the time the Smiths apply, the average of the 30-year fixed interest rate for home mortgages of the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation is 13 percent, which is the “prevailing rate.” The “stated interest rate” on the Smiths’ loan will be 75 percent of the “prevailing rate,” or 934 percent (the lender could have charged up to 80 percent of the prevailing rate).

The Smiths’ payments will be calculated so that at the end of the projected loan term of 18 years, the total of all payments owed to the lender will be two hundred forty thousand dollars ($240,000), 80 percent of the estimated value of the Smiths’ home after 18 years.

Two items must be subtracted from the two hundred forty thousand dollar ($240,000) future value before the Smiths’ payment can be calculated:

(a) Since the Smiths’ are requesting an advance of seventeen thousand dollars ($17,000) to pay off their existing mortgage and for closing costs, seventeen thousand dollars ($17,000), plus interest on seventeen thousand dollars ($17,000) at 934 percent for 18 years, for a total of ninety-six thousand fifty-seven dollars ($96,057), must be subtracted from the two hundred forty thousand dollars ($240,000) available for lending. This leaves one hundred forty-three thousand nine hundred forty-three dollars ($143,943).

(b) The lender’s share of appreciation of the value of the home is also subtracted before calculating the monthly payment. Since the home is projected to increase in value by one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000), the lender’s share, 25 percent, equals thirty-seven
 thousand five hundred dollars ($37,500). When subtracted from one hundred forty-three thousand nine hundred forty-three dollars ($143,943), this leaves one hundred six thousand four hundred forty-three dollars ($106,443) for monthly payments.

The monthly payment is calculated on the basis of one hundred six thousand four hundred forty-three dollars ($106,443), over an 18-year term with interest at 934 percent. This equals one hundred eighty-four dollars ($184) per month. The Smiths’ will receive one hundred eighty-four dollars ($184) per month until a maturity event occurs.

At the time of occurrence of a maturity event, the Smiths, or their successors, if they are both deceased, will owe the seventeen thousand dollars ($17,000) advanced initially, plus the sum of all the monthly payments of one hundred eighty-four dollars
 ($184) received by them until the occurrence of the maturity event, plus interest at 934 percent on all of the above from the time the funds were advanced until occurrence of the maturity event, plus actual contingent interest calculated as described in Section III below. Interest, compounded no more often than monthly, on all of the above shall accrue at the prevailing rate from the date of any maturity event until the loan is paid in full.

Because interest accumulates rapidly, when a large initial advance is received, or the projected loan term is relatively long, the monthly payment is significantly lower. For instance, if the Smiths’ were 80 years old, and received no lump-sum advance, their monthly payment would be seven hundred forty-nine dollars ($749) per month.

The longer the loan has been in effect, of course, the
 greater the amount that will be owed, as monthly payments and interest accumulate, and as the home appreciates in value. Unless the borrowers choose to sell the home or refinance the loan, monthly payments will continue until both are deceased, no matter how long they live so long as they continue to occupy the property. Thus, the total loan obligation is not limited to the projected life span of the borrowers, nor to any set dollar amount, regardless of the projected maximum. Regardless of how much principal has been advanced by Shared Appreciation Loans for Seniors, and regardless of how much stated interest and actual contingent interest have accumulated or been earned, payments will continue. If the borrower lives substantially longer than the actuarial prediction, it is possible that the total of principal and acquired stated interest plus actual contingent interest, may exceed the value of the home. IN NO EVENT, HOWEVER, WILL A BORROWER OR A BORROWER’S ESTATE BE LIABLE ON THE SHARED APPRECIATION LOAN